Utah statutes.
30-3-8.   Remarriage -- When unlawful.

Neither party to a divorce proceeding which dissolves their marriage by decree may marry any person other than the spouse from whom the divorce was granted until it becomes absolute.  If an appeal is taken, the divorce is not absolute until after affirmance of the decree.



Amended by Chapter 154, 1988 General Session

